Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska57-1102
Crossing public roads or highways; rights acquired; restrictions.

Any such person, company, corporation, or association, in the laying, relaying, operation, and maintenance of any such pipeline within the State of Nebraska, shall have the right to enter upon and cross, with such pipeline, any public road or highway, under such reasonable regulations and restrictions as may be prescribed by the Department of Transportation, if it is a state or federal highway, or by the county board of each county, as to all other public roads and highways within such county, and shall also have the right to lay, relay, operate, and maintain such pipeline in and along any public road or highway.

Laws 1963, c. 323, § 2, p. 980;

Laws 2017, LB339, § 179.